src/fst/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON a5_fiini 
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** intresantti etc
!+A: x5_troppi_even ; 
+A+Sg+Nom: R ; 
+A+Cmp/SgNom: R ;
+A+Cmp/SgGen:^WG%>n R ;
+A+Sg+Nom: PxK ;
+A+Sg+Gen:^WG%> n_PxK ;  
!+A+Sg+Par:^IDEL%>t^A PxK ; !
+A+Sg+Par:%>^A PxK ; ! 
+A+Sg+Ill:^HMETA%>h^V^V n_PxK ; ! 
+A+Sg+Ill:^HMET2%>h^V^V n_PxK ; ! 
+A+Sg+Ine:^WG%>ss^A PxK ;       ! 
+A+Sg+Ela:^WG%>st^A PxxK ;       ! 
+A+Sg+Abl:^WG%>lt^A PxK ;       ! 
+A+Sg+Tra:^WG TRA ;             ! tropiksi
+A+Sg+Abe:^WG%>tt^A PxK ;       ! 
+A+Pl+Nom:^WG t_PxK ;
+A+Pl+Gen:%>e n_PxK ;  
+A+Pl+Gen:^WG%>tte n_PxK ;
+A+Pl+Par:%>^A PxK ;  
+A+Pl+Par:%>i2^A PxK ;
+A+Pl+Ill:^HMETA%>h^V^V n_PxK ; ! trophiin
+A+Pl+Ill:^HMET2%>h^V^V n_PxK ; ! trophiin
+A+Pl+Ine:^WG%>ss^A PxK ;       ! tropissa
+A+Pl+Ela:^WG%>st^A PxxK ;       ! tropista
+A+Pl+Abl:^WG%>lt^A PxK ;       ! tropilta
+A+Pl+Tra:^WG TRA ;             ! tropiksi
+A+Pl+Abe:^WG%>tt^A PxK ;       ! tropitta
+A+Comp+Sg+Nom:^WG%>mpi K ; 
+A+Comp+Pl+Gen:%>mpien K ;
+A+Superl+Sg+Nom:%>i2 n_PxK ;

LEXICON a5_fiini_even
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** fiini etc
a5_fiini ;
+A+Sg+Ess:%>n^A PxK ;           ! troppina
+A+Sg+All:^WG%>le PxK ;        ! tropile
+A+Sg+Ade:^WG%>l^A PxK ;        ! tropila
+A+Pl+All:^WG%>le PxK ;        ! tropile
+A+Pl+Ade:^WG%>l^A PxK ;        ! tropila
+A+Pl+Ess:%>n^A PxK ;           ! troppina
+A+Comp: 3comp ; 
!+A+Superl: 3sup ; 
!3sup ; !Pl All Superl normaalimmile
+A+Superl+Sg+Nom:%>n K ; 
+A+Superl+Sg+Gen:%>m^An K ; 
+A+Superl+Sg+Par:%>mp^A^A K ;
+A+Superl+Sg+Tra:%>m^Aksi K ;
+A+Superl+Sg+Ill:%>mph^A^An K ;
+A+Superl+Sg+Ine:%>m^Ass^A K ;
+A+Superl+Sg+Ela:%>m^Ast^A K ;
+A+Superl+Sg+Abl:%>m^Alt^A K ;
+A+Superl+Sg+Ess:%>mp^Ann^A K ; 
+A+Superl+Sg+All:%>m^Alle K ; !normaalimmale
+A+Superl+Sg+Ade:%>m^All^A K ;
+A+Superl+Pl+Ess:%>mpinn^A K ;
+A+Superl+Pl+All:%>mille K ; !normaalimmile
+A+Superl+Pl+Ade:%>mill^A K ;
+A+Superl+Pl+Nom:%>m^At K ;
+A+Superl+Pl+Nom:%>i2m^At K ; !CHECK EK variant?
+A+Superl+Pl+Gen:%>mitten K ;
+A+Superl+Pl+Par:%>mpi^A K ;
+A+Superl+Pl+Tra:%>miksi K ;
+A+Superl+Pl+Ill:%>mphiin K ;
+A+Superl+Pl+Ine:%>miss^A K ;
+A+Superl+Pl+Ela:%>mist^A K ;
+A+Superl+Pl+Abl:%>milt^A K ;



LEXICON a5_fiini_odd
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** normaali etc
a5_fiini ;
+A+Sg+Ess:^WG%>nn^A PxK ;           ! troppina
+A+Sg+All:^WG%>lle PxK ;        ! tropile
+A+Sg+Ade:^WG%>ll^A PxK ;        ! tropila
+A+Pl+All:^WG%>lle PxK ;        ! tropile
+A+Pl+Ade:^WG%>ll^A PxK ;        ! tropila
+A+Pl+Ess:^WG%>nn^A PxK ;           ! troppina
+A+Comp+Sg+Gen:%>mm^A%>n K ; 
+A+Comp+Sg+Par:%>mp^A^A K ;
+A+Comp+Sg+Tra:%>mm^Aksi K ;
+A+Comp+Sg+Ill:%>mph^A^An K ;
+A+Comp+Sg+Ine:%>mm^Ass^A K ;
+A+Comp+Sg+Ela:%>mm^Ast^A K ;
+A+Comp+Sg+Ess:%>mp^An^A K ; 
+A+Comp+Sg+All:%>m^Alle K ; 
+A+Comp+Sg+Ade:%>m^All^A K ;
+A+Comp+Sg+Abl:%>mm^Alt^A K ;
+A+Comp+Pl+Nom:%>mm^At # ;
+A+Comp+Pl+Gen:%>mmitten K ;
+A+Comp+Pl+Par:%>mpi^A K ;
+A+Comp+Pl+Tra:%>mmiksi K ;
+A+Comp+Pl+Ill:%>mphiin K ;
+A+Comp+Pl+Ine:%>mmiss^A K ;
+A+Comp+Pl+Ela:%>mmist^A K ;
+A+Comp+Pl+Abl:%>mmilt^A K ;
+A+Comp+Pl+Ess:%>mpin^A K ;
+A+Comp+Pl+All:%>mmile K ;
+A+Comp+Pl+Ade:%>mmil^A K ;

!3sup ; !Pl All Superl normaalimmile
+A+Superl+Sg+Nom:%>n K ; 
+A+Superl+Sg+Gen:%>mm^An K ; 
+A+Superl+Sg+Par:%>mp^A^A K ;
+A+Superl+Sg+Tra:%>mm^Aksi K ;
+A+Superl+Sg+Ill:%>mph^A^An K ;
+A+Superl+Sg+Ine:%>mm^Ass^A K ;
+A+Superl+Sg+Ela:%>mm^Ast^A K ;
+A+Superl+Sg+Abl:%>mm^Alt^A K ;
+A+Superl+Sg+Ess:%>mp^An^A K ; 
+A+Superl+Sg+All:%>mm^Ale K ; !normaalimmale
+A+Superl+Sg+Ade:%>mm^Al^A K ;
+A+Superl+Pl+Ess:%>mpin^A K ;
+A+Superl+Pl+All:%>mmile K ; !normaalimmile
+A+Superl+Pl+Ade:%>mmil^A K ;
+A+Superl+Pl+Nom:%>mm^At K ;
+A+Superl+Pl+Gen:%>mmitten K ;
+A+Superl+Pl+Par:%>mpi^A K ;
+A+Superl+Pl+Tra:%>mmiksi K ;
+A+Superl+Pl+Ill:%>mphiin K ;
+A+Superl+Pl+Ine:%>mmiss^A K ;
+A+Superl+Pl+Ela:%>mmist^A K ;
+A+Superl+Pl+Abl:%>mmilt^A K ;


!! ## Comparative inflection
!  ----------------------

LEXICON 3comp  
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**  2syll adj, 3syll comparative
+Sg+Ess:%>mp^Ann^A K ; 
+Sg+All:%>m^Alle K ; 
+Sg+Ade:%>m^All^A K ;
+Pl+Ess:%>mpinn^A K ;
+Pl+All:%>mille K ;
+Pl+Ade:%>mill^A K ;
xcomp ; ! common cases from here

LEXICON 4comp  
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**   3syll adj, 4syll comparative
+Sg+Ess:%>mp^An^A K ; !!≈ * @CODE@
+Sg+All:%>m^Ale K ; !!≈ * @CODE@ etc.
+Sg+Ade:%>m^Al^A K ;
+Pl+Ess:%>mpin^A K ;
+Pl+All:%>mile K ;
+Pl+Ade:%>mil^A K ;
xcomp ; ! common cases from here


LEXICON xcomp  
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**   common for 2syll and 3syll
!+A+Comp+Sg+Nom:^WG%>mpi # ; !!≈ * @CODE@
+Sg+Gen:^WG%>m^A%>n K ; !TEST 30/7
+Sg+Par:%>mp^A^A K ;
+Sg+Tra:%>m^Aksi K ;
+Sg+Ill:%>mph^A^An K ;
+Sg+Ine:%>m^Ass^A K ;
+Sg+Ela:%>m^Ast^A K ;
+Sg+Abl:%>m^Alt^A K ;
+Pl+Nom:%>m^At # ;
+Pl+Gen:%>mitten K ;
+Pl+Par:%>mpi^A K ;
+Pl+Tra:%>miksi K ;
+Pl+Ill:%>mphiin K ;
+Pl+Ine:%>miss^A K ;
+Pl+Ela:%>mist^A K ;
+Pl+Abl:%>milt^A K ;





!! ### Superlative inflection
!  ----------------------

LEXICON 3sup  
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**   2syll adj, 3syll superlative
+Sg+Ess:%>i5mp^Ann^A K ; !!≈ * @CODE@
+Sg+All:%>i5m^Alle K ; !!≈ * @CODE@ etc.
+Sg+Ade:%>i5m^All^A K ;
+Pl+Ess:%>i5mpinn^A K ;
+Pl+All:%>i5mille K ;
+Pl+Ade:%>i5mill^A K ;
xsup ; ! common cases from here

LEXICON 4sup 
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**  3syll adj, 4syll superlative
+Sg+Ess:%>i5mp^An^A K ; !!≈ * @CODE@
+Sg+All:%>i5m^Ale K ; !!≈ * @CODE@ etc.
+Sg+Ade:%>i5m^Al^A K ;
+Pl+Ess:%>i5mpin^A K ;
+Pl+All:%>i5mile K ;
+Pl+Ade:%>i5mil^A K ;
xsup ; ! common cases from here

LEXICON xsup 
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**   common for 2syll and 3syll
+Sg+Nom:^WG%>i5n K ; 
+Sg+Gen:%>i5m^An K ; 
+Sg+Par:%>i5mp^A^A K ;
+Sg+Tra:%>i5m^Aksi K ;
+Sg+Ill:%>i5mph^A^An K ;
+Sg+Ine:%>i5m^Ass^A K ;
+Sg+Ela:%>i5m^Ast^A K ;
+Sg+Abl:%>i5m^Alt^A K ;
+Pl+Nom:%>i5m^At K ;
+Pl+Gen:%>i5mitten K ;
+Pl+Par:%>i5mpi^A K ;
+Pl+Tra:%>i5miksi K ;
+Pl+Ill:%>i5mphiin K ;
+Pl+Ine:%>i5miss^A K ;
+Pl+Ela:%>i5mist^A K ;
+Pl+Abl:%>i5milt^A K ;
