src/fst/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON AdjectiveRoot !!≈ @CODE@
pruuni a5_fiini_even ; 
kleini a5_fiini_even ;
fiini a5_fiini_even ;
privaatti a5_fiini_odd ; 
privaatti+Err/Orth:privatti a5_fiini_odd ;
tyffi:tyffi a5_fiini_even ;
pleeki:pleek2i a5_fiini_even ;
plankki:plankki a5_fiini_even ;
klookki:klookki a5_fiini_even ;
fräkki:fräkki a5_fiini_even ;
oorninki:oorninki a5_fiini_odd ;
klooki:klooki a5_fiini_even ;
friski:friski a5_fiini_even ;
falski:falski a5_fiini_even ;
färski:färski a5_fiini_even ;
ratikaali:ratikaali a5_fiini_even ; 
normaali:normaali a5_fiini_odd ;
tikitaali:tikitaali a5_fiini_even ; 
krongeli:krongeli a5_fiini_odd ;
enkkeli:enkkeli a5_fiini_odd ;
passeli:passeli a5_fiini_odd ;
seniili:seniili a5_fiini_odd ;
viriili:viriili a5_fiini_odd ;
aktyelli:aktyelli a5_fiini_even ; 
snooli:snooli a5_fiini_even ;
raikuli:raikuli a5_fiini_odd ;
laakomi:laakomi a5_fiini_odd ;
kleini:kleini a5_fiini_even ;
karvanfiini:karvan#fiini a5_fiini_even ;
hiuksenfiini:hiuksen#fiini a5_fiini_even ;
pruuni:pruuni a5_fiini_even ;
nahkapruuni:nahka#pruuni a5_fiini_even ;
maksanpruuni:maksan#pruuni a5_fiini_even ;
punasenpruuni:punasen#pruuni a5_fiini_even ;
nuuskunpruuni:nuuskun#pruuni a5_fiini_even ;
frääni:frääni a5_fiini_even ;
knappi:knappi a5_fiini_even ;
klaari:klaari a5_fiini_even ;
pauhari:pauhari a5_fiini_odd ;
söötsyyri:sööt#syyri a5_fiini_even ;
preliminääri:preliminääri a5_fiini_odd ;
perversi:perversi a5_fiini_odd ;
invaliiti:invaliiti a5_fiini_even ; 
perfekti:perfekti a5_fiini_odd ;
tysti:tysti a5_fiini_even ;
tesperaatti:tesperaatti a5_fiini_even ; 
platti:platti a5_fiini_even ;
violetti:violetti a5_fiini_odd ;
enkkeltti:enkkeltti a5_fiini_odd ;
vakantti:vakantti a5_fiini_odd ;
intresantti:intresantti a5_fiini_even ; 
intressantti:intressantti a5_fiini_even ; 
intteligentti:intteligentti a5_fiini_odd ;
intelligentti:intelligentti a5_fiini_odd ;
nätti:nätti a5_fiini_even ;
söötti:söötti a5_fiini_even ;
äkkelsöötti:äkkel#söötti a5_fiini_even ;
matalaintensiivi:matala#intensiivi a5_fiini_even ; 
primitiivi:primitiivi a5_fiini_even ;
